District of Columbia statutes.
9-1105.03

Severability.

If any part of this subchapter is declared unconstitutional the constitutionality of no other part of the subchapter shall be affected thereby.

Sept. 8, 1965, 79 Stat. 666, Pub. L. 89-173, § 8
Whistleblower protection for other employees, “instrumentality” defined, see § 2-223.01.
1981 Ed., § 1-2423.
1973 Ed., § 1-1426.